Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,221
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out sections 77-27,210 to 77-27,221.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 36.